Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.375

Dismissal or suspension of criminal prosecution in exchange for protection order.

The practice of dismissing or suspending a criminal prosecution in exchange for the issuance of a protection order undermines the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as encouraging that practice.

[ 2021 c 215 s 52.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.